Virginia statutes. Title 59.1. Trade and Commerce.
Chapter 11. Fireworks.

§§ 59.1-142 through 59.1-148.

Repealed by Acts 2002, c. 856.

Cross references.

For current provision authorizing localities to provide for the issuance of permits for the display of fireworks, see §

15.2-974

. For current provisions relating to fireworks, see the Virginia Statewide Fire Prevention Code, §

27-94

et seq.